test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/V-AI-micisow_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mîciso - ok : # Ordinary VAI verb "eat" -  Wolvengrey p. 396; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 36

     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimîcison
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimîcison
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mîcisow
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: mîcisoyiwa
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimîcisonân
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimîcisonaw, kimîcisonânaw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimîcisonâwâw
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mîcisowak

     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-mîcison, nikîmîcison]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-mîcison, kikîmîcison]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-mîcisow, kîmîcisow]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-mîcisoyiwa, kîmîcisoyiwa]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikî-mîcisonân, nikîmîcisonân]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikî-mîcisonaw, kikîmîcisonaw, kikî-mîcisonânaw, kikîmîcisonânaw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikî-mîcisonâwâw, kikîmîcisonâwâw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-mîcisowak, kîmîcisowak]
     
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-mîcison, nikamîcison]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-mîcison, kikamîcison]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-mîcisow, kamîcisow]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl: [ka-mîcisoyiwa, kamîcisoyiwa]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl: [nika-mîcisonân, nikamîcisonân]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl: [kika-mîcisonaw, kikamîcisonaw, kikamîcisonânaw, kika-mîcisonânaw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl: [kika-mîcisonâwâw, kikamîcisonâwâw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl: [ka-mîcisowak, kamîcisowak]
     
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-mîcison, niwîmîcison]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-mîcison, kiwîmîcison]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-mîcisow, wîmîcisow]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-mîcisoyiwa, wîmîcisoyiwa]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl: [niwî-mîcisonân, niwîmîcisonân]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl: [kiwî-mîcisonaw, kiwîmîcisonaw, kiwî-mîcisonânaw, kiwîmîcisonânaw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl: [kiwî-mîcisonâwâw, kiwîmîcisonâwâw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-mîcisowak, wîmîcisowak]
     
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mîcisoyân, êmîcisoyân]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mîcisoyan, êmîcisoyan]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mîcisot, êmîcisot]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mîcisoyit, êmîcisoyit]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mîcisoyâhk, êmîcisoyâhk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mîcisoyahk, êmîcisoyahk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mîcisoyêk, êmîcisoyêk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mîcisocik, êmîcisocik]
     
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mîcisoyân, êmîcisoyân]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mîcisoyan, êmîcisoyan]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mîcisot, êmîcisot]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mîcisoyit, êmîcisoyit]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mîcisoyâhk, êmîcisoyâhk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mîcisoyahk, êmîcisoyahk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mîcisoyêk, êmîcisoyêk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mîcisocik, êmîcisocik]
         
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kî-mîcisoyân, êkîmîcisoyân]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [ê-kî-mîcisoyan, êkîmîcisoyan]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-mîcisot, êkîmîcisot]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisoyit, êkîmîcisoyit]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisoyâhk, êkîmîcisoyâhk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisoyahk, êkîmîcisoyahk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisoyêk, êkîmîcisoyêk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisocik, êkîmîcisocik]
     
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg: [ê-wî-mîcisoyân, êwîmîcisoyân]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg: [ê-wî-mîcisoyan, êwîmîcisoyan]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg: [ê-wî-mîcisot, êwîmîcisot]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisoyit, êwîmîcisoyit]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisoyâhk, êwîmîcisoyâhk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisoyahk, êwîmîcisoyahk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisoyêk, êwîmîcisoyêk]
     PV/e+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisocik, êwîmîcisocik]
    
    
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwîwîcimîcisomâw, niwî-wîci-mîcisomâw] # COMM SET I
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomâw, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomâw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwîwîcimîcisomânân, niwî-wîci-mîcisomânân]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomânaw, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomânaw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomâwâw, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomâwâw]
     
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwîwîcimîcisomâwak, niwî-wîci-mîcisomâwak] # COMM SET I-Pl
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomâwak, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomâwak]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwîwîcimîcisomânânak, niwî-wîci-mîcisomânânak]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomânawak, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomânawak]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomâwâwak, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomâwâwak]

     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomin, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomin] # COMM SET II
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwîwîcimîcisominân, kiwî-wîci-mîcisominân]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwîwîcimîcisominâwâw, kiwî-wîci-mîcisominâwâw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwîwîcimîcisominân, kiwî-wîci-mîcisominân]


     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimîcisomêw, wî-wîci-mîcisomêw] # COMM SET III
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimîcisomêwak, wî-wîci-mîcisomêwak]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimîcisomêyiwa, wî-wîci-mîcisomêyiwa]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimîcisomimêw, wî-wîci-mîcisomimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimîcisomimêwak, wî-wîci-mîcisomimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwîwîcimîcisomimâwa, niwî-wîci-mîcisomimâwa] # COMM SET IV
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomimâwa, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomimâwa]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwîwîcimîcisomimânâna, niwî-wîci-mîcisomimânâna]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomimânawa, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomimânawa]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcimîcisomimâwâwa, kiwî-wîci-mîcisomimâwâwa]
    
     
     mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: mîcisoyâni
     mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: mîcisoyani
     mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mîcisoci
     mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mîcisoyici
     mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: mîcisoyâhki
     mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [mîcisoyahko, mîcisoyahki]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: mîcisoyêko
     mîcisow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mîcisotwâwi
     
     


     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîciso
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mîcisotân
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mîcisok
     
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mîcisohkan
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mîcisohkahk
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mîcisohkêk
